Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
CHAPTER 610 Procedural Matters

610.010.
District Court jurisdiction of juvenile matters.

Unless otherwise exempted by KRS Chapters 600 to 645, the juvenile session of the District Court of each county shall have exclusive jurisdiction in proceedings concerning any child living or found within the county who has not reached his or her eighteenth birthday or of any person who at the time of committing a public offense was under the age of eighteen (18) years, who allegedly has committed a public offense prior to his or her eighteenth birthday, except a motor vehicle offense involving a child sixteen (16) years of age or older. A child sixteen (16) years of age or older taken into custody upon the allegation that the child has committed a motor vehicle offense shall be treated as an adult and shall have the same conditions of release applied to him or her as an adult. A child taken into custody upon the allegation that he or she has committed a motor vehicle offense who is not released under conditions of release applicable to adults shall be held, pending his or her appearance before the District Court, in a facility as defined in KRS

15A.067

. Children sixteen (16) years of age or older who are convicted of, or plead guilty to, a motor vehicle offense shall, if sentenced to a term of confinement, be placed in a facility for that period of confinement preceding their eighteenth birthday and an adult detention facility for that period of confinement subsequent to their eighteenth birthday. The term “motor vehicle offense” shall not be deemed to include the offense of stealing or converting a motor vehicle nor operating the same without the owner’s consent nor any offense which constitutes a felony;

Unless otherwise exempted by KRS Chapters 600 to 645, the juvenile session of the District Court of each county or the family division of the Circuit Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction in proceedings concerning any child living or found within the county who has not reached his or her eighteenth birthday and who allegedly:

Is beyond the control of the school or beyond the control of parents as defined in KRS

600.020

;

Is an habitual truant from school;

Is an habitual runaway from his or her parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child;

Is dependent, neglected, or abused;

Has committed an alcohol offense in violation of KRS

244.085

; or

Is mentally ill.

Actions brought under subsection (1) of this section shall be considered to be public offense actions.

Actions brought under subsection (2)(a), (b), (c), and (e) of this section shall be considered to be status offense actions.

Actions brought under subsection (2)(d) of this section shall be considered to be nonoffender actions.

Actions brought under subsection (2)(f) of this section shall be considered to be mental health actions.

Nothing in this chapter shall deprive other courts of the jurisdiction to determine the custody or guardianship of children upon writs of habeas corpus or to determine the custody or guardianship of children when such custody or guardianship is incidental to the determination of other causes pending in such other courts; nor shall anything in this chapter affect the jurisdiction of Circuit Courts over adoptions and proceedings for termination of parental rights.

The court shall have no jurisdiction to make permanent awards of custody of a child except as provided by KRS

620.027

.

If the court finds an emergency to exist affecting the welfare of a child, or if the child is eligible for the relative or fictive kin caregiver assistance as established in KRS

620.142

, it may make temporary orders for the child’s custody; however, if the case involves allegations of dependency, neglect, or abuse, no emergency removal or temporary custody orders shall be effective unless the provisions of KRS Chapter 620 are followed. Such orders shall be entirely without prejudice to the proceedings for permanent custody of the child and shall remain in effect until modified or set aside by the court. Upon the entry of a temporary or final judgment in the Circuit Court awarding custody of such child, all prior orders of the juvenile session of the District Court in conflict therewith shall be deemed canceled. This section shall not work to deprive the Circuit Court of jurisdiction over cases filed in Circuit Court.

The court of each county wherein a public offense, as defined in subsection (1) of this section, is committed by a child who is a resident of another county of this state shall have concurrent jurisdiction over such child with the court of the county wherein the child resides or the court of the county where the child is found. Whichever court first acquires jurisdiction of such child may proceed to final disposition of the case, or in its discretion may make an order transferring the case to the court of the county of the child’s residence or the county wherein the offense was committed, as the case may be.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the court from holding a child in contempt of court to enforce valid court orders previously issued by the court, subject to the requirements contained in KRS

610.265

and

630.080

.

Except as provided in KRS 635.060(4), 630.120(5), or

635.090

, nothing in this chapter shall confer upon the District Court or the family division of the Circuit Court, as appropriate, jurisdiction over the actions of the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet in the placement, care, or treatment of a child committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice or committed to or in the custody of the cabinet; or to require the department or the cabinet to perform, or to refrain from performing, any specific act in the placement, care, or treatment of any child committed to the department or committed to or in the custody of the cabinet.

Unless precluded by KRS Chapter 635 or 640, in addition to informal adjustment, the court shall have the discretion to amend the petition to reflect jurisdiction pursuant to the proper chapter of the Kentucky Unified Juvenile Code.

The court shall have continuing jurisdiction over a child pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, to review dispositional orders, and to conduct permanency hearings under 42

U.S.C. sec. 675(5)

(c) until the child is placed for adoption, returned home to his or her parents with all the court imposed conditions terminated, completes a disposition pursuant to KRS

635.060

, or reaches the age of eighteen (18) years.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2019, ch. 73, § 4, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 35, § 11, effective March 26, 2020.

610.012.
Exclusive jurisdiction of District Court or family division of Circuit Court concerning temporary detention of suspected runaway.

The District Court or the family division of the Circuit Court shall have exclusive jurisdiction of proceedings under this section.

Proceedings to temporarily detain a child suspected of being a runaway by means of an emergency protective custody order, pending further appropriate court action, shall be initiated by filing a complaint with the court-designated worker.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a child who is suspected of being a runaway may be detained in a nonsecure facility for a period of time not to exceed seventy-two (72) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, or, if the court makes a finding on the record that no less restrictive alternative is available, in a secure juvenile detention facility for a period of time not to exceed twenty-four (24) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, pursuant to an ex parte emergency protective order pending a court hearing to determine whether to return the child to his or her custodian or give custody of the child to the cabinet.

If, at the hearing held as provided for in subsection (3) of this section, the child is not released, the court shall issue an emergency custody order pursuant to KRS Chapter 620 and place the child with the cabinet and the cabinet shall file a dependency, neglect, or abuse action.

All hearings subsequent to the issuance of an emergency custody order shall be in accordance with KRS Chapter 620.

If the child is released, except to the cabinet pursuant to an emergency custody order, the court-designated worker shall initiate a status offense case.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a child coming under the purview of KRS Chapter 615.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 132, § 34, effective July 1, 2015.

Notes to Decisions

610.015.
Procedure when child tried as an adult — Matters to be tried by Circuit Court — Release of records.

A child who is charged with an offense which classifies him for trial as an adult in the Circuit Court or the adult session of the District Court shall, at the time the decision is made by the court to try the child as an adult, be subject to the arrest, post-arrest, and criminal procedures that apply to an adult, except for the place of confinement, as provided in the Kentucky Revised Statutes and the Rules of Criminal Procedure.

The Circuit Court shall try all misdemeanor, violation, traffic offense, and status offense matters included in or which arise from the act or series of acts which result in the trial of a child as an adult in the Circuit Court.

Records, limited to the records of the present case in which the child has been charged, relating to a child charged under this section shall not be made public until after the child has been indicted and arraigned on the offense for trial of the child as an adult. Release of the child’s treatment, medical, mental, or psychological records is prohibited unless presented as evidence in Circuit Court. Release of any records resulting from the child’s prior abuse and neglect under Title IV-E or Title IV-B of the Federal Social Security Act is also prohibited.

This section shall not be construed as permitting the release of the child’s treatment, medical, mental, or psychological records unless those records are presented as evidence in open court. The release of information relative to the child’s eligibility for services under Title IV-E or IV-B of the Federal Social Security Act is prohibited.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 358, § 19, effective July 15, 1997.

610.020.
Complaints.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS Chapters 600 to 645:

The complaint and all subsequent court documents shall be entitled: “In the interest of . . . . . , a child.” The complaint shall be verified and may be upon information and belief. It shall set forth plainly:

The facts which bring the child within the purview of KRS Chapters 600 to 645;

The name, age and residence of the child;

The name and residence of each parent;

If the child has a legal guardian or is in the custody of or under the supervision of an adult other than a parent, the name and residence of such person;

If no parent, guardian or other such person is known or can be found, the name and residence of the nearest known adult relative of the child; and

If the child is in the custody or control of a person other than the parent, guardian or nearest adult relative, the name and residence of such person.

If any of the facts required to be stated in the complaint are not known by the complainant, it shall so state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 21, effective July 1, 1987.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, §§ 32.5, 32.18, 32.21, 32.23.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Forms, Juvenile Court, Form 5.1, Form 5.3.

610.030.
Preliminary inquiry procedures.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS Chapters 600 to 645:

If any person files a complaint alleging that a child, except a child alleged to be neglected, abused, dependent or mentally ill who is subject to the jurisdiction of the court, may be within the purview of KRS Chapters 600 to 645, the court-designated worker shall make a preliminary determination as to whether the complaint is complete. In any case where the court-designated worker finds that the complaint is incomplete, the court-designated worker shall return the complaint without delay to the person or agency originating the complaint or having knowledge of the facts, or to the appropriate law enforcement agency having investigative jurisdiction of the offense, and request additional information in order to complete the complaint. The complainant shall promptly furnish the additional information requested;

Upon receipt of a complaint which appears to be complete and which alleges that a child has committed a public offense, the court-designated worker shall refer the complaint to the county attorney for review pursuant to KRS

635.010

.

If after review the county attorney elects to proceed, the court-designated worker shall conduct a preliminary intake inquiry to recommend whether the interests of the child or the public require that further action be taken or whether, in the interest of justice, the complaint can be resolved informally without the filing of a petition;

Upon receipt of a complaint that appears to be complete and that alleges that the child has committed a status offense, the court-designated worker shall conduct a preliminary intake inquiry to determine whether the interests of the child or the public require that further action be taken;

Prior to conducting a preliminary intake inquiry, the court-designated worker shall notify the child and the child’s parent, guardian, or other person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child in writing:

Of their opportunity to be present at the preliminary intake inquiry;

That they may have counsel present during the preliminary intake inquiry as well as the formal conference thereafter;

That all information supplied by the child to a court-designated worker during any process prior to the filing of the petition shall be deemed confidential and shall not be subject to subpoena or to disclosure without the written consent of the child.

Information may be shared between treatment providers, the court-designated worker, and the family accountability, intervention, and response team to enable the court-designated worker to facilitate services and facilitate compliance with the diversion agreement; and

That the child has the right to deny the allegation and demand a formal court hearing;

The preliminary intake inquiry shall include the administration of an evidence-based screening tool and, if appropriate and available, a validated risk and needs assessment, in order to identify whether the child and his or her family are in need of services and the level of intervention needed;

Upon the completion of the preliminary intake inquiry, the court-designated worker may:

If the complaint alleges a status offense, determine that no further action be taken subject to review by the family accountability, intervention, and response team;

If the complaint alleges a public offense, refer the complaint to the county attorney;

Refer a public offense complaint for informal adjustment; or

Based upon the results of the preliminary intake inquiry, other information obtained, and a determination that the interests of the child and the public would be better served, and with the written approval of the county attorney for a public offense complaint, if necessary, conduct a formal conference and enter into a diversion agreement;

Upon receiving written approval of the county attorney, if necessary, to divert a public offense complaint, and prior to conducting a formal conference, the court-designated worker shall advise in writing the complainant, the victim if any, and the law enforcement agency having investigative jurisdiction of the offense:

Of the recommendation and the reasons therefor and that the complainant, victim, or law enforcement agency may submit within ten (10) days from receipt of such notice a complaint to the county attorney for special review; or

In the case of a misdemeanor diverted pursuant to KRS 635.010(4), of the fact that the child was statutorily entitled to divert the case;

A formal conference shall include the child and his or her parent, guardian, or other person exercising custodial control or supervision. The formal conference shall be used to:

Present information obtained at the preliminary intake inquiry; and

Develop a diversion agreement that shall require that the child regularly attend school, shall not exceed six (6) months in duration, and may include:

Referral of the child, and family if appropriate, to a public or private entity or person for the provision of identified services to address the complaint or assessed needs;

Referral of the child, and family if appropriate, to a community service program within the limitations provided under KRS 635.080(2);

Restitution, limited to the actual pecuniary loss suffered by the victim, if the child has the means or ability to make restitution;

Notification that the court-designated worker may apply graduated sanctions for failure to comply with the diversion agreement;

Any other program or effort which reasonably benefits the community and the child; and

A plan for monitoring the child’s progress and completion of the agreement;

If a child successfully completes a diversion agreement, the underlying complaint shall be dismissed and further action related to that complaint shall be prohibited.

If a child fails to appear for a preliminary intake inquiry, declines to enter into a diversion agreement, or fails to complete a diversion agreement, then:

For a public offense complaint, the matter shall be referred to the county attorney for formal court action and, if a petition is filed, the child may request that the court dismiss the complaint based upon his or her substantial compliance with the terms of diversion; and

For a status offense complaint, the court-designated worker shall refer the matter to the family accountability, intervention, and response team for review and further action;

If a complaint is referred to the court, the complaint and findings of the court-designated worker’s preliminary intake inquiry shall be submitted to the court for the court to determine whether process should issue; and

At any stage in the proceedings described in this section, the court or the county attorney may review any decision of the court-designated worker. The court upon its own motion or upon written request of the county attorney may refer any complaint for a formal hearing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 22, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 15, effective April 10, 1988; 2014, ch. 132, § 36, effective July 1, 2015.

610.040.
Issuance of summons and notice of petition.

After a public or status offense petition has been filed and after such further investigation as the court may direct, unless the parties appear voluntarily, the court shall issue a summons briefly reciting the substance of the petition and requiring the person who has the custody or control of the child to appear personally and bring the child before the court at a time and place stated. If the person so summoned is other than a parent or guardian of the child, the parent or guardian or both shall also be notified of the pendency of the proceeding and of the time and place appointed. Summons may be issued requiring the appearance of any other person whose presence, in the opinion of the judge, is necessary.

The summons and notice provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall be served personally by the delivery of a copy thereof to the person summoned, unless the judge is satisfied that personal service would be impracticable, in which event the judge may order service by mail addressed to the last known address. Service by mail shall be deemed to be effected upon mailing. Notice by mail shall be presumed sufficient if mailed at least forty-eight (48) hours before the time for appearance specified in the summons or notice.

Unless otherwise provided, service of summons or notice may be made by any suitable person, other than an employee of the cabinet, under the direction of the court, and upon request of the court shall be made by any peace officer.

Any person summoned who, without reasonable cause, fails to appear, may be proceeded against for contempt of court. In case the summons cannot be served, or the parties served fail to appear, or in any case when it appears to the judge that the service will be ineffectual, or that the welfare of the child requires that he be brought forthwith before the court, a warrant may be issued for the parent, guardian, person having custodial control or supervision of the child, or the child.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 23, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 16, effective April 10, 1988; 2018 ch. 159, § 15, effective July 14, 2018.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Juvenile Code Proceedings, § 258.00.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, §§ 32.5, 32.16, 32.22.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Forms, Juvenile Court, Form 5.7.

610.050.
Temporary change in custody.

If it appears to the court, by affidavit or by sworn testimony, that the child is a danger to himself or the community, or is in such condition or surroundings that his welfare is being harmed or threatened with harm to such a degree that his best interest requires that his custody be immediately changed by the court from the original custodian to another, the judge may sign an order giving temporary custody of the child to a suitable custodian consenting to temporary custody. However, if this case involves allegations of dependency, neglect, or abuse, no emergency removal or temporary custody orders shall be effective unless the provisions of KRS Chapter 620 are followed; and, if the case involves allegations of mental illness, the provisions of KRS Chapter 645 shall be followed. As a part of such order, the court may direct that the child shall be taken into custody by the peace officer serving the summons or by any other peace officer and placed as directed by the court. In any event, a copy of the temporary custody order shall be served on the parent, guardian or other person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child when the summons is served. The temporary custody order shall be effective until the case is heard on its merits or until modified by the court. As a result of such order, the child shall be placed in custody and care in a home or other suitable facility.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 24, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 17, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 538, § 6, effective April 13, 1998.

610.060.
Duty of court upon formal proceeding — Right to attend proceeding — Payment for counsel.

If the Circuit or District Court determines that a formal proceeding is required in the interest of the child or to determine the truth or falsity of the allegations against the child, a petition shall be required pursuant to KRS

610.020

, and the court shall, when the child is brought before the court:

Explain to the child and his parents, guardian, or person exercising custodial control their respective rights to counsel and, if the child and his parents, guardian, or person exercising custodial control are unable to obtain counsel, shall appoint counsel for the child, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, and, unless specified to the contrary by other provisions of KRS Chapters 600 to 645, may appoint counsel for the parents, guardian, or person exercising custodial control;

Explain the right against self-incrimination by saying that the child, parents, relative, guardian, or custodian may remain silent concerning the charges against the child, and that anything said may be used against the child;

Unless limited by statute, explain the right to confront anyone who has accused the child and to cross-examine that person on the allegations made against the child;

Advise the child and his parents, guardian, or person exercising custodial control of the right to appeal from a determination of the court; and

Advise the child that these rights belong to him and may not be waived by his parents, guardian, or person exercising custodial control.

No court shall accept a plea or admission or conduct an adjudication hearing involving a child accused of committing any felony offense, any offense under KRS Chapter 510, or any offense, including the violation of a valid court order, for which the court intends to impose detention or commitment as a disposition unless that child is represented by counsel.

For a child accused of committing any other offense, before a court permits the child to proceed beyond notification of the right to counsel required by paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this subsection without representation, the court shall:

Conduct a hearing about the child’s waiver of counsel; and

Make specific findings of fact that the child knowingly, intelligently and voluntarily waived his right to counsel.

Unless otherwise exempted in KRS Chapters 600 to 645, a child and his parents or person exercising custodial control shall have a right to attend the hearing if such attendance will not unnecessarily delay the hearing.

Subject to the provisions of KRS

31.125

, the court may order a parent to pay for counsel for the child if the court determines that the parent has the ability to pay for such counsel. The fact that a child is committed to a state agency shall not be cause for the court to order that agency to pay for counsel.

Subject to Rule 43.09 of the Rules of Civil Procedure, the court shall permit the victim, the victim’s parents or legal guardian, or, if emancipated, the victim’s spouse, or the legal representative of any of these, to attend all proceedings under this section.

An attempt shall be made to notify the persons specified in subsection (5) of this section of the time, date, and place of all proceedings under this section. Each District Court shall, by rule, establish the means of notification and the person or agency responsible for making the notifications. The failure of a victim or other person specified in subsection (5) of this section to receive notice shall not delay the proceedings in the case.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 25, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 18, effective April 10, 1988; Acts 1996, ch. 358, § 20, effective July 15, 1997; 1998, ch. 443, § 14, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 203, § 1, effective April 5, 2002; 2008, ch. 87, § 4, effective July 15, 2008.

610.070.
Hearings.

All cases involving children brought before the court whose cases are under the jurisdiction of the court shall be granted a speedy hearing and shall be dealt with by the court without a jury.

The hearings shall be conducted in a formal manner, unless specified to the contrary by other provisions of KRS Chapters 600 to 645.

The general public shall be excluded and only the immediate families or guardians of the parties before the court, witnesses necessary for the prosecution and defense of the case, the probation worker with direct interest in the case, a representative from the Department of Juvenile Justice, the victim, his parent or legal guardian, or if emancipated, his spouse, or a legal representative of either, such persons admitted as the judge shall find have a direct interest in the case or in the work of the court, and such other persons as agreed to by the child and his attorney may be admitted to the hearing. A parent, legal guardian, or spouse if a witness shall be admitted to the hearing only during and after his testimony at the hearing, and witnesses shall be admitted to the hearing only for the duration of their testimony. The court may order the exclusion of a parent, legal guardian, or spouse, if it is shown to the satisfaction of the court that the parent, legal guardian, or spouse may physically disrupt the proceedings or may do violence to any participant therein. The mere presence of a parent, legal guardian, or spouse shall not be deemed to be a disruption of the proceedings merely because their presence may make the defendant uncomfortable; the court shall find a potential for actual physical disruption of the proceedings before an exclusion may be granted for this reason.

The court may order the parents, guardians, or persons exercising custodial control over the child to be present at any hearing or other proceeding involving the child.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 26, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 19, effective April 10, 1988; 1994, ch. 407, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 358, § 21, effective July 15, 1997; 1998, ch. 443, § 15, effective July 15, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/94). In 1994 Ky. Acts ch. 407, sec. 1, the sentence beginning “A parent, legal guardian, or spouse if a witness” in subsection (3) of this statute had instead “of a witness”. The drafter advises and the context clearly establishes that “if” not “of” should appear here, and this correction has been made to remedy a manifest clerical or typographical error under KRS 7.136(1)(h).

610.072.
Attendance of public at hearings in courts participating in pilot project authorized by KRS 21A.190.

Any statute, administrative procedure, or court rule limiting or prohibiting public attendance at court proceedings conducted under KRS Chapter 620 or 625 shall not apply in a court which is participating in a pilot project authorized by KRS

21A.190

to the extent that the Chief Justice, and the presiding judge for a case specified in KRS

21A.190

, have authorized public attendance at the proceeding.

The provisions of this section shall not permit attendance by the public at any court handling a case under KRS Chapter 620 or 625 which is not participating in the pilot project authorized by KRS

21A.190

, except as otherwise authorized by law.

Unless authorized by law, the provisions of this section shall not permit attendance by the public in any court participating in the pilot project authorized by KRS

21A.190

which is not authorized by the Supreme Court to admit the public for any case or class of cases.

The provisions of this section shall not permit attendance by the public at any case before a court participating in the pilot project authorized by KRS

21A.190

when the judge presiding over the case determines that the case shall be closed.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 76, § 3, effective July 15, 2016.

610.080.
Bifurcated hearings in juvenile proceedings.

Juvenile proceedings shall consist of two (2) distinct hearings, an adjudication and a disposition, which shall be held on separate days unless the child, after consultation with an attorney, waives the right to a formal predisposition investigation report and moves that the hearings be held the same day. However, if the disposition is to be commitment, the child’s waiver shall not be valid without the consent of the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet.

The adjudication shall determine the truth or falsity of the allegations in the petition and shall be made on the basis of an admission or confession of the child to the court or by the taking of evidence.

Unless otherwise exempted, upon motion by any child brought before the court on a petition under KRS 610.010(1), or 610.010(2)(a), (b), or (c), the Rules of Criminal Procedure shall apply. All adjudications shall be supported by evidence beyond a reasonable doubt, unless specified to the contrary by other provisions of KRS Chapters 600 to 645. For actions under KRS 610.010(2)(d) the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure shall apply.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 27, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 20, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 538, § 7, effective April 13, 1998; 2008, ch. 87, § 18, effective July 15, 2008.

610.090.
Prohibitions on use of evidence in subsequent proceedings.

Unless the child is proceeded against as an adult in accordance with the law governing crimes as provided in KRS Chapter 635 or 640, the disposition of any child under the provisions of KRS Chapters 600 to 645, or any evidence given in the case, shall not be lawful evidence against the child for any purpose, except in subsequent cases involving the same child under KRS Chapters 600 to 645.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 28, effective July 1, 1987; 1996, ch. 358, § 22, effective July 15, 1997.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). Under 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 358, sec. 67(1), the amendment of this statute by Section 22 of that Act becomes effective July 15, 1997.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, § 32.26.

610.100.
Investigation — Informal adjustment.

Unless there is a suitable prior disposition investigation report or unless waived by the child who is represented by counsel, before making disposition of the case of a child brought before the court under the provisions of KRS Chapters 630 or 635, whether by complaint pursuant to KRS

610.020

, or by reason of having been taken into custody pursuant to KRS

610.190

, the judge shall cause an investigation to be made concerning the nature of the specific act complained of and any surrounding circumstances which suggest the future care and guidance which should be given the child. The investigation shall include an inquiry into the child’s age, habits, school record, general reputation, and everything that may pertain to his or her life, and character. The investigation shall also include an inquiry into the home conditions, life, and character of the person having custody of the child. The investigation shall also include an assessment of the parent or guardian’s ability to pay all or part of the cost of the child’s care and treatment should the child be ordered into a treatment program or placed on supervised probation. The result of the investigation, including the result of the validated risk and needs assessment, shall be reported in writing to the court and to counsel for the parties three (3) days prior to the child’s dispositional hearing and shall become a part of the record of the proceedings. The child may waive the three (3) day requirement. Objections by counsel at the dispositional hearing to portions of the dispositional report shall be noted in the record.

The investigation shall be conducted by a suitable public or private agency. The cabinet and the Department of Juvenile Justice may furnish investigation services under agreements with the individual juvenile courts. For this purpose, any county judge/executive or chief executive officer of an urban-county government may enter into a contract on behalf of his or her county with the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet for the furnishings of such services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 29, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 21, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 358, § 23, effective in part July 1, 1997, and in part July 15, 1997; 1998, ch. 443, § 16, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 193, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2014, ch. 132, § 37, effective July 1, 2015.

610.105.
Informal adjustment permissible at any time with notice to parties.

Upon the court’s motion or the motion of any party, following notice to the county attorney, an informal adjustment may be made at any time during the proceedings and with the victim and with those persons specified in KRS

610.070

having prior notification of the motion.

An informal adjustment does not require adjudication of the case. If an adjudication has occurred, the court shall dismiss the case following successful completion under subsection (3) of this section.

If the court orders an informal adjustment, the order may include any of the following:

Referral of the case to diversion, but, if the child does not successfully complete the terms of the diversion, the case shall not be dismissed as a result of the diversion but shall be returned to court; or

Placement of the child on community supervision or monitoring by the court under the informal adjustment with additional conditions as determined appropriate by the court for a period not to exceed six (6) months.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 132, § 33, effective July 1, 2015.

610.110.
Disposition of case.

The disposition shall determine the action to be taken by the court on behalf of, and in the best interest of, the child under the provisions of KRS Chapter 630 or 635.

At the disposition, all information helpful in making a proper disposition, including oral and written reports and the results of a validated risk and needs assessment, shall be received by the court in compliance with subsection (1) of this section and relied upon to the extent of their probative value, provided that the parties or their counsel shall be afforded an opportunity to examine and controvert the reports.

The court shall, and the Department of Juvenile Justice may upon request, notify the law enforcement agency of the child’s city, county, or urban-county of residence as appropriate and the law enforcement agencies where any offense was committed of the disposition of each case and of each child committed by the court who is placed in a residential treatment facility by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet.

If any court commits a child to the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, a child-caring facility, or child-placing agency, the court shall cause to be transmitted to the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, facility, or agency, as appropriate, a certified copy of the commitment order, together with a summary of the court’s information concerning the child. A certified copy of the court order shall be proof of the authority of the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, facility, or agency to hold the child. Such certified order shall be sufficient authority for any law enforcement officer to take into custody any person named therein and deliver him or her to such a place as shall be directed by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, facility, or agency given custody of him or her in the order.

In placing a child on probation in a home or boarding home, or in committing a child to a child-caring facility or child-placing agency, the court shall as far as practicable select a home, facility, or agency operated or governed by persons of a similar religious faith as the parents of the child.

Upon motion of the child and agreement of the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, as appropriate, the court may authorize an extension of commitment up to age twenty-one (21) for the purpose of permitting the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, as appropriate, to assist the child in establishing independent living arrangements if a return to the child’s home is not in his or her best interest.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 30, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 22, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 358, § 24, effective July 1, 1997; 1998, ch. 606, § 21, effective July 15, 1998; 2014, ch. 132, § 38, effective July 15, 2014.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). Under 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 358, sec. 67(3), the amendment of this statute by Section 24 of that Act becomes effective July 1, 1997, in that it deals functions of the Department of Juvenile Justice.

610.115.
Circumstances permitting court to order further detention of child in custody of Department of Juvenile Justice or cabinet. [Repealed.]